Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB968.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 30 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding sections to read:§ 2702.2. Active duty military fishing reciprocity.(a) Permission.--Notwithstanding section 2709(f) (relating to exemptions from license requirements), any person who possesses a valid and lawfully issued active duty military fishing license or permit which has been issued under the laws of another state, regardless of whether a reciprocity agreement exists between the Commonwealth and the state under subsection (b), may fish in any of the waters of this Commonwealth or in 12345678910111213141516171819 any boundary waters if all of the following apply:(1) The state provides a reciprocal privilege for a nonresident individual who is on active military duty in the armed forces of the United States.(2) The Attorney General has determined that the fishing laws of the state are similar to the fishing laws of this Commonwealth.(b) Reciprocity.--(1) The Attorney General shall have the power and duty to enter into reciprocity agreements with other states providing for the mutual recognition of active duty military fishing within this Commonwealth and the similar allowance of fishing allowed by the other state. To carry out this duty, the Attorney General is authorized to negotiate reciprocity agreements and grant recognition of an active duty military fishing allowance or license issued by another state.(2) The Attorney General shall report to the General Assembly within 180 days of the effective date of this paragraph and annually thereafter concerning the agreements which have been consummated under this subsection.§ 2702.3. Disabled veteran annual fishing license reciprocity.(a) Permission.--Notwithstanding section 2709(f) (relating to exemptions from license requirements), any person who possesses a valid and lawfully issued disabled veteran annual fishing license or permit which has been issued under the laws of another state, regardless of whether a reciprocity agreement exists between the Commonwealth and the state under subsection (b), may fish in any of the waters of this Commonwealth or in any boundary waters if all of the following apply:(1) The state provides a reciprocal privilege for 20250HB0968PN1049 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 individuals possessing a disabled veteran annual fishing license issued under section 2707(a) (relating to disabled veterans and former prisoners of war).(2) The Attorney General has determined that the fishing laws of the state are similar to the fishing laws of this Commonwealth.(b) Reciprocity.--(1) The Attorney General shall have the power and duty to enter into reciprocity agreements with other states providing for the mutual recognition of disabled veteran annual fishing licenses issued by the Commonwealth and a similar license or permit issued by the other state. To carry out this duty, the Attorney General is authorized to negotiate reciprocity agreements and grant recognition of a disabled veteran annual fishing license or permit issued by another state.(2) The Attorney General shall report to the General Assembly within 180 days of the effective date of this paragraph and annually thereafter concerning the agreements which have been consummated under this subsection.Section 2. Title 34 is amended by adding sections to read:§ 2703.1. Active duty military hunting reciprocity.(a) Permission.--Notwithstanding section 2706(b) and (e) (relating to resident license and fee exemptions), any person who possesses a valid and lawfully issued active duty military hunting license or permit which has been issued under the laws of another state, regardless of whether a reciprocity agreement exists between the Commonwealth and the state under subsection (b), may hunt within this Commonwealth if all of the following apply:20250HB0968PN1049 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The state provides a reciprocal privilege for a nonresident individual who is on active military duty in the armed forces of the United States.(2) The Attorney General has determined that the hunting laws of the state are similar to the hunting laws of this Commonwealth.(b) Reciprocity.--(1) The Attorney General shall have the power and duty to enter into reciprocity agreements with other states providing for the mutual recognition of active duty military hunting within this Commonwealth and the similar allowance of hunting allowed by the other state. To carry out this duty, the Attorney General is authorized to negotiate reciprocity agreements and grant recognition of an active duty military hunting allowance or license issued by another state.(2) The Attorney General shall report to the General Assembly within 180 days of the effective date of this section and annually thereafter concerning the agreements which have been consummated under this subsection.§ 2703.2. Disabled veteran annual hunting license reciprocity.(a) Permission.--Notwithstanding section 2706(b) and (e) (relating to resident license and fee exemptions), any person who possesses a valid and lawfully issued disabled veteran annual hunting license or permit which has been issued under the laws of another state, regardless of whether a reciprocity agreement exists between the Commonwealth and the state under subsection (b), may hunt in this Commonwealth if all of the following apply:(1) The state provides a reciprocal privilege for individuals possessing a disabled veteran annual hunting 20250HB0968PN1049 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 license issued under section 2706(b).(2) The Attorney General has determined that the hunting laws of the state are similar to the hunting laws of this Commonwealth.(b) Reciprocity.--(1) The Attorney General shall have the power and duty to enter into reciprocity agreements with other states providing for the mutual recognition of disabled veteran annual hunting licenses issued by the Commonwealth and a similar license or permit issued by the other state. To carry out this duty, the Attorney General is authorized to negotiate reciprocity agreements and grant recognition of a disabled veteran annual hunting license or permit issued by another state.(2) The Attorney General shall report to the General Assembly within 180 days of the effective date of this paragraph and annually thereafter concerning the agreements which have been consummated under this subsection.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0968PN1049 - 5 - 12345678910111213141516171819